sk-SK: Typ video rekordéra: DVR (digitálny videorekordér); Hybridný DVR; NVR (sieťový videorekordér); SVR (streamový videorekordér); XVR (päť-hybridný videorekordér); Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de gravador de vídeo: DVR (gravador de vídeo digital); DVR híbrido; NVR (gravador de vídeo em rede); SVR (gravador de vídeo em stream); XVR (gravador de vídeo penta-híbrido); Outro
th: ประเภทเครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอ: DVR (เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอดิจิทัล); DVR แบบไฮบริด; NVR (เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอเครือข่าย); SVR (เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอสตรีม); XVR (เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอเพนตะบริด); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Vaizdo įrašymo įrenginio tipas: DVR (skaitmeninis vaizdo įrašytuvas); Hibridinis DVR; NVR (tinklinis vaizdo įrašytuvas); SVR (srautinis vaizdo įrašytuvas); XVR (penkių tipų vaizdo įrašytuvas); Kita
ja: ビデオレコーダータイプ: DVR（デジタルビデオレコーダー）; ハイブリッドDVR; NVR（ネットワークビデオレコーダー）; SVR（ストリームビデオレコーダー）; XVR（ペンタブリッドビデオレコーダー）; その他
zh-CN: 视频录像机类型: DVR（数字录像机）; 混合型 DVR; NVR（网络录像机）; SVR（流媒体录像机）; XVR（五合一录像机）; 其他
nl: Videorecorder type: DVR (digitale videorecorder); Hybride DVR; NVR (netwerkvideorecorder); SVR (streamvideorecorder); XVR (penta-brid-videorecorder); Andere
ru: Тип видеорегистратора: DVR (цифровой видеорегистратор); Гибридный DVR; NVR (сетевой видеорегистратор); SVR (потоковый видеорегистратор); XVR (пятигибридный видеорегистратор); Другой
hu: Videorögzítő típusa: DVR (digitális videorögzítő); Hibrid DVR; NVR (hálózati videorögzítő); SVR (stream videorögzítő); XVR (penta-brid videorögzítő); Egyéb
vi: Loại máy ghi video: DVR (Máy ghi hình kỹ thuật số); DVR lai; NVR (Máy ghi hình mạng); SVR (Máy ghi luồng video); XVR (Máy ghi hình 5 trong 1); Khác
nb: Videoopptaker type: DVR (digital videoopptaker); Hybrid DVR; NVR (nettverksvideoopptaker); SVR (strømmevideoopptaker); XVR (penta-brid videoopptaker); Annet
pl: Typ rejestratora wideo: DVR (cyfrowy rejestrator wideo); Hybrydowy DVR; NVR (sieciowy rejestrator wideo); SVR (strumieniowy rejestrator wideo); XVR (pięciotrybowy rejestrator wideo); Inne
ro-RO: Tip înregistrator video: DVR (înregistrator video digital); DVR hibrid; NVR (înregistrator video de rețea); SVR (înregistrator video stream); XVR (înregistrator video penta-brid); Altele
cs: Typ video rekordéru: DVR (digitální videorekordér); Hybridní DVR; NVR (síťový videorekordér); SVR (streamový videorekordér); XVR (penta-brid videorekordér); Jiné
da: Videooptagertype: DVR (digital videooptager); Hybrid DVR; NVR (netværksvideooptager); SVR (stream-videooptager); XVR (penta-brid videooptager); Andet
fi: Videotallentimen tyyppi: DVR (digitaalinen videotallennin); Hybridi-DVR; NVR (verkkovideotallennin); SVR (virtavideotallennin); XVR (penta-brid-videotallennin); Muu
ko: 비디오 레코더 유형: DVR (디지털 비디오 레코더); 하이브리드 DVR; NVR (네트워크 비디오 레코더); SVR (스트림 비디오 레코더); XVR (펜타브리드 비디오 레코더); 기타
es: Tipo de grabador de video: DVR (grabador de video digital); DVR híbrido; NVR (grabador de video en red); SVR (grabador de transmisión de video); XVR (grabador de video pentahíbrido); Otros
bg-BG: Тип видеорекордер: DVR (цифров видеозаписвач); Хибриден DVR; NVR (мрежов видеозаписвач); SVR (поточен видеозаписвач); XVR (петафункционален видеозаписвач); Други
sl-SI: Tip video snemalnika: DVR (digitalni video snemalnik); Hibridni DVR; NVR (mrežni video snemalnik); SVR (pretočni video snemalnik); XVR (pet-hibridni video snemalnik); Drugo
fr: Type d’enregistreur vidéo: DVR (enregistreur vidéo numérique); DVR hybride; NVR (enregistreur vidéo réseau); SVR (enregistreur vidéo en flux); XVR (enregistreur vidéo penta-brid); Autre
de: Videorecorder-Typ: DVR (Digitaler Videorekorder); Hybrid-DVR; NVR (Netzwerk-Videorekorder); SVR (Stream-Videorekorder); XVR (Penta-Brid-Videorekorder); Sonstiges
pt-BR: Tipo de gravador de vídeo: DVR (gravador de vídeo digital); DVR híbrido; NVR (gravador de vídeo em rede); SVR (gravador de vídeo de stream); XVR (gravador de vídeo penta-híbrido); Outro
el: Τύπος εγγραφέα βίντεο: DVR (ψηφιακός καταγραφέας βίντεο); Υβριδικός DVR; NVR (καταγραφέας βίντεο δικτύου); SVR (καταγραφέας βίντεο ροής); XVR (πενταυβριδικός καταγραφέας βίντεο); Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta video snimača: DVR (digitalni video snimač); Hibridni DVR; NVR (mrežni video snimač); SVR (stream video snimač); XVR (penta-brid video snimač); Ostalo
tr: Video kaydedici tipi: DVR (Dijital video kayıt cihazı); Hibrit DVR; NVR (Ağ video kayıt cihazı); SVR (Akış video kayıt cihazı); XVR (Penta-brid video kayıt cihazı); Diğer
it: Tipo di videoregistratore: DVR (registratore video digitale); DVR ibrido; NVR (registratore video di rete); SVR (registratore video streaming); XVR (registratore video penta-brid); Altro
en: Video recorder type: DVR (Digital Video Recorder); Hybrid DVR; NVR (Network Video Recorder); SVR (Stream Video Recorder); XVR (Penta-brid Video Recorder); Other
sv: Videoinspelningstyp: DVR (digital videobandspelare); Hybrid DVR; NVR (nätverksvideobandspelare); SVR (strömmande videobandspelare); XVR (femkanalig videobandspelare); Övrigt
zh-TW: 影像錄影機類型: DVR（數位錄影機）; 混合式 DVR; NVR（網路錄影機）; SVR（串流錄影機）; XVR（五合一錄影機）; 其他